District of Columbia statutes.
9-902

Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority created.

There is created the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority, (“Authority”), a public body corporate and politic and independent of all other bodies, having the powers and jurisdiction enumerated by this chapter, and other and additional powers as shall be conferred upon it jointly by the legislative authorities of the Commonwealth of Virginia and the District or by either of the jurisdictions and concurred in by the legislative authority of the other jurisdiction.

Dec. 3, 1985, D.C. Law 6-67, § 3, 32 DCR 6093
1981 Ed., § 7-1252.